Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 4 MOTOR VEHICLE REGISTRATION
§ 49-420Q. Pet friendly license plates.

Any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402, Idaho Code, or registered under any other section of law for which the purchase of special plates is allowed may apply for and, upon department approval, receive pet friendly license plates in lieu of regular license plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Availability of pet friendly license plates for other vehicles shall be subject to the rules, policies, and procedures of the department.

In addition to the regular registration fee required in this chapter, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of plates, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Thirteen dollars ($13.00) of the initial fee and thirteen dollars ($13.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-two dollars ($22.00) of each initial fee and twelve dollars ($12.00) of each renewal fee shall be deposited in the Idaho humane society’s pet lovers fund and used in accordance with the provisions of subsection (5) of this section.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may display the plates on another vehicle only upon receipt of the new registration from the department.

The pet friendly license plate shall be of a color and design in accordance with the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code. The design and any slogan on the plate shall be acceptable to the Idaho humane society and shall be approved by the Idaho transportation department utilizing a numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program, including costs of plate design, shall be paid by the Idaho humane society.

§ 49-420R. Choose life license plates.

Effective January 1, 2021, any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402, Idaho Code, or registered under any other section of law for which the purchase of special plates is allowed, may apply for and, upon department approval, receive choose life license plates in lieu of regular license plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Availability of choose life license plates for other vehicles shall be subject to the rules, policies, and procedures of the department.

In addition to the regular registration fee required in this chapter, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of plates, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Thirteen dollars ($13.00) of the initial fee and thirteen dollars ($13.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-two dollars ($22.00) of each initial fee and twelve dollars ($12.00) of each renewal fee shall be transferred by the state treasurer to Choose Life Idaho, Inc., and shall be used in Idaho to provide grant dollars to support life-affirming pregnancy resource centers in order to help pregnant women choose life for their babies and to encourage adoption as a positive choice for women with unplanned pregnancies.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may display the plates on another vehicle only upon receipt of the new registration from the department.

The choose life license plate shall be of a color and design in accordance with the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code. The design and any slogan on the plate shall be acceptable to Choose Life Idaho, Inc., and shall be approved by the Idaho transportation department utilizing a numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program, including costs of plate design, shall be paid by Choose Life Idaho, Inc.

Sample choose life license plates may be purchased for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), thirteen dollars ($13.00) of which shall be deposited in the state highway account and seventeen dollars ($17.00) of which shall be transferred to Choose Life Idaho, Inc., to be used for the purpose stated in subsection (2) of this section.

§ 49-421. Registration cards.

Upon the registration of a vehicle, the registering agency shall issue to the owner, as defined in section 49-116(3), Idaho Code, a registration card that shall contain the date issued, the registration number assigned the owner and to the vehicle, the name and address of the owner, a description of the registered vehicle, identification number, and any other information the department may require.

The owner, upon receiving a registration card, shall validate proof of compliance with the insurance requirements of section 49-1229, Idaho Code.

Upon a change of address, the registrant shall report such change to the county assessor or the department within thirty (30) days following the change of address.

It is an infraction for any person to fail to notify the department of a change of address as required by the provisions of subsection (3) of this section.

§ 49-422. Registration fees — Manufactured homes and towed recreational vehicles.

The fees for registering manufactured homes or towed recreational vehicles shall be four dollars ($4.00). In addition to the registration fee, and as a prerequisite to registering there shall be an assessment levied on each manufactured home for ad valorem tax as provided in chapter 3, title 63, Idaho Code. An applicant for a manufactured home registration shall be required to exhibit the general property tax receipt for the year of registration before a license may be issued. An applicant for a towed recreational vehicle registration shall be required to obtain the recreational vehicle annual license as required in section 49-445, Idaho Code, in conjunction with the registration required in this section. It shall be unlawful for any manufactured home or towed recreational vehicle to be moved on any highway without first being registered. The registration fees collected as specified in this section shall be paid to the assessor of the county where the registration was purchased. Fifty percent (50%) of the registration fees shall be placed in the county current expense fund and the balance of the fees shall be deposited in the highway distribution account.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to new manufactured homes being transported either prior to first sale at retail or to the initial setup location of the original purchaser.

§ 49-423, 49-424. [Repealed.]

§ 49-425. Lost certificate or license plate — Duplicates.

In the event that any license plate or registration card issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be lost, mutilated, or become illegible, the person to whom the plate or registration card is issued shall make immediate application for and obtain a duplicate or replacement upon furnishing information of fact satisfactory to the department and upon payment of the required fees. The fee for duplicate or replacement plates is provided in sections 49-450 and 49-202(2) (f), Idaho Code, for a replacement registration card whether issued in print or electronically.

§ 49-426. Exemptions from operating fees.

The provisions of this chapter with respect to operating fees shall not apply to:

Motor vehicles owned or leased by the United States, the state, a city, a county, any department thereof, any political subdivision or municipal corporation of the state, any taxing district of the state, any state registered nonprofit subscription fire protection unit, or any organization, whether incorporated or unincorporated, organized for the operation, maintenance, or management of an irrigation project or irrigation works or system or for the purpose of furnishing water to its members or shareholders, but in other respects shall be applicable.

Farm tractors, implements of husbandry, those manufactured homes which qualify for an exemption under the provisions of section 49-422, Idaho Code, road rollers, wheel mounted tar buckets, portable concrete and/or mortar mixers, wheel mounted compressors, tow dollies, portable toilet trailers, street sweepers, other construction equipment, forestry equipment, lawn and grounds equipment and similar devices as determined by the department which are temporarily operated or moved upon the highways need not be registered under the provisions of this chapter, nor shall implements of husbandry be considered towed units under registration of vehicle combinations as defined in section 49-108(2), Idaho Code. In addition, self-propelled wheelchairs, three-wheeled bicycles, wheelchair conveyances, golf carts, lawn mowers, and scooters operated by persons who by reason of physical disability are otherwise unable to move about as pedestrians shall be exempt from registration requirements under the provisions of this chapter. Motorcycles, motorbikes, utility type vehicles and all-terrain vehicles need not be licensed under the provisions of this chapter or numbered pursuant to the provisions of section 67-7122, Idaho Code, if they are being used exclusively in connection with agricultural, horticultural, dairy and livestock growing and feeding operations or used exclusively for snow removal purposes. Travel upon the public highways shall be limited to travel between farm or ranch locations. Motorcycles, motorbikes, utility type vehicles and all-terrain vehicles used for this purpose shall meet the emblem requirements of section 49-619, Idaho Code.

Any political subdivision of the state of Idaho may, but only after sufficient public notice is given and a public hearing held, adopt local ordinances or resolutions designating highways or sections of highways under its jurisdiction which are closed to all-terrain vehicles, utility type vehicles, specialty off-highway vehicles and motorbikes licensed pursuant to this chapter and numbered pursuant to section 67-7122, Idaho Code. The operation of licensed and numbered all-terrain vehicles, utility type vehicles and motorbikes and those vehicles exempt from licensing and numbering pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall not be permitted on controlled access highways, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section. The requirements of title 18 and chapters 2, 3, 6, 8, 12, 13 and 14, title 49, Idaho Code, shall apply to the operation of any all-terrain vehicle, utility type vehicle or motorbike upon highways. Costs related to the posting of signs on highways or sections of highways that are closed to such vehicles, indicating the ordinance, are eligible for reimbursement through the motorbike recreation account created in section 67-7126, Idaho Code.

The Idaho transportation board may designate sections of state highways upon which all-terrain vehicles, utility type vehicles, specialty off-highway vehicles and motorbikes may travel. All-terrain vehicles, utility type vehicles, specialty off-highway vehicles and motorbikes shall be permitted to cross a non-full access-controlled highway at a public road intersection. All-terrain vehicles, utility type vehicles, specialty off-highway vehicles and motorbikes shall be permitted to travel upon that portion of any non-full access-controlled state highway with a speed limit of forty-five (45) miles per hour or less lying within and extending one (1) mile beyond the boundaries of a municipality unless restricted by the Idaho transportation board or closed as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The requirements of title 18 and chapters 2, 3, 6, 8, 12, 13 and 14, title 49, Idaho Code, shall apply to the operation of all-terrain vehicles, utility type vehicles, specialty off-highway vehicles and motorbikes when upon state highways.
(5) All-terrain vehicles, utility type vehicles, specialty off-highway vehicles and motorbikes may be used on highways located on state lands or federal lands which are not part of the highway system of the state of Idaho, provided the numbering requirements of section 67-7122, Idaho Code, are met.

§ 49-427. Registration card to be carried.

The registration card issued for a vehicle required to be registered by the provisions of this chapter shall, while the vehicle is being operated upon a highway, be in the possession of the driver or carried in the vehicle and be subject to inspection by any peace officer. For drivers of commercial vehicles registered pursuant to section 49-434 or 49-435, Idaho Code, an electronic format of the registration card is permitted.

§ 49-428. Display of plate and stickers.

License plates assigned to a motor vehicle shall be attached, one (1) in the front and the other in the rear, with the exception of the following:

The license plate assigned to a motorcycle, all-terrain vehicle, utility type vehicle, motorbike or semitrailer and the license plate assigned to a motor vehicle operated by a manufacturer, repossession agent or dealer shall be attached to the rear.

Vehicles displaying year of manufacture, old timer, classic car or street rod license plates shall be allowed to display one (1) plate attached to the rear of the vehicle.

The license plate attached to a tractor shall be attached to the front.

The wrecker plate shall be displayed on the vehicle being towed in such a manner as to be visible when the vehicle being towed is approached from the rear.

Every license plate shall at all times be securely fastened to the vehicle to which it is assigned to prevent the plate from swinging, be at a height not less than twelve (12) inches from the ground, measuring from the bottom of the plate, be in a place and position to be clearly visible, and shall be maintained free from foreign materials and in a condition to be clearly legible, and all registration stickers shall be securely attached to the license plates and shall be displayed as provided in section 49-443(4), Idaho Code.

License plates shall be displayed during the current registration year. The annual registration sticker for the current registration year shall be displayed on each license plate, except for trailers, semitrailers, and commercial vehicles over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds under the provisions of sections 49-434 and 49-435, Idaho Code. For the purposes of this title, the license plates together with the registration stickers shall be considered as license plates for the year designated on the registration sticker.

§ 49-429. Display of copy of application pending receipt of license plate.

When an owner chooses to display special license plates, upon payment of required fees the department or the assessor shall issue to the applicant a copy of the application. The copy must be displayed in a suitable place on the rear window of a motor vehicle, or if a motorcycle, displayed on the motorcycle. The copy shall constitute compliance with the provisions of this chapter until such time as the license plates are received from the department. The copy of the application shall not have any value as compliance with the provisions of this chapter from and after the receipt of the license plates from the department.

§ 49-430. Registration to be renewed.

Reregistration of vehicles shall be accomplished annually or by registration period in the same manner as the original registration and upon the payment of the required fee. The director may extend this date as to individuals, counties or the state for not to exceed forty-five (45) days for good cause shown.

A violation of the provisions of this section shall be an infraction.

§ 49-431. Assignment or transfer of interest — Procedure.

Whenever the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of sections 49-402 and 49-402A, Idaho Code, transfers or assigns his title or interest thereto, the registration card and license plate shall remain with and in the possession of the transferor, and before the license plate shall be displayed upon another vehicle owned by the transferor, the transferor shall have that vehicle registered as provided for in section 49-401A, Idaho Code. The transfer fees collected shall be paid to the county treasurer where the vehicle is registered and deposited in the county current expense fund or in the state highway account if the transfer is made by the department.

For all vehicles registered under the provisions of section 49-402(1), Idaho Code, the transferor shall pay the registration fee as specified in that subsection less the registration fee already paid, plus a transfer fee of five dollars ($5.00). If the transferor shall have an older vehicle to be registered, the transferor shall pay a transfer fee of five dollars ($5.00).

For vehicles registered in accordance with subsections (2) through (4) of section 49-402, Idaho Code, the operating fee shall be the fee specified in those subsections, plus a transfer fee of five dollars ($5.00).

For utility trailers registered under the provisions of section 49-402A, Idaho Code, the original registration shall continue until its expiration date, upon payment of a transfer fee of five dollars ($5.00).

For all vehicles registered under the fee schedule in section 49-434, Idaho Code, except proportionally registered vehicles under section 49-435, Idaho Code, the transferor shall pay the registration fee as specified in that section less the registration fee already paid, plus a transfer fee of five dollars ($5.00).

For all vehicles registered under section 49-435, Idaho Code, the transferor shall pay the registration fee as specified in section 49-434, Idaho Code, apportioned according to the provisions of section 49-435, Idaho Code, less the apportioned fee previously paid plus a transfer fee of eight dollars ($8.00).

§ 49-432. Temporary registration for residents and nonresidents — Fees.

When a vehicle or combination of vehicles subject to registration is to be moved upon the public highways in the state of Idaho, the department may issue a permit in lieu of registration for any vehicle or combination of vehicles upon the payment of a fee as set forth in the following schedule:

One hundred twenty (120) hour permit

Fuel permit ............................... $60.00

Thirty (30) day unladen weight permit ............................... $60.00

Permits to operate a vehicle or combination of vehicles in excess of the registered maximum gross vehicle weight up to a maximum of one hundred twenty-nine thousand (129,000) pounds gross vehicle weight shall be:

One hundred twenty (120) hour permit to increase gross weight
............................... $50.00

Thirty (30) day permit to increase gross vehicle weight:

Permits issued pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be limited to three (3) per vehicle in a calendar year except for those permits provided for in subsection (1)(b) and (c). The provisions of this subsection (3) with respect to limiting the number of permits issued shall not apply to transporters and wreckers as defined in sections 49-121 and 49-124, Idaho Code, or to laden dealer and manufacturer plates as provided for in sections 49-411(4) and 49-1627(5), Idaho Code.

A temporary permit shall be in a form, and issued under rules adopted by the board, and shall be displayed at all times while the vehicle is being operated on the highways by posting the permit upon the windshield of each vehicle or in another prominent place, where it may be readily legible.

Any permit issued pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be purchased prior to movement of the vehicle on a highway, and such permit shall be in addition to and available only to a vehicle which is currently and validly registered in Idaho pursuant to section 49-432(1), 49-434(1), 49-434(8)(c) or 49-435, Idaho Code.

The department may select vendors to serve as agents on state highways for the purpose of selling permits where fixed ports of entry do not adequately serve a respective highway entering the state. The vendor shall be remunerated at the rate of three dollars ($3.00) per permit sold, and he shall collect the fees specified in this section and pay the fees to the department. The vendor shall guarantee payment by giving a bond to the state in a sum as shall be fixed by the board, the premium on the bond to be paid by the department.

Single vehicle ............................... $60.00

Combination of vehicles, where such combination of vehicles includes more than one (1) unregistered vehicle ............................... $120.00

An owner-operator vehicle moving between lessee fleets where the vehicle registration was issued in the name of the former lessee shall be eligible for a thirty (30) day unladen weight permit for the unladen movement from the point of entry into the state to the destination of the new lessee’s place of business.

If an annual registration is purchased within thirty (30) calendar days of issuance of a permit under paragraph (a) or (c) of this subsection (1), the amount of the permit fee shall be applied to the registration fee. No portion of a permit fee is subject to refund.

80,000

86,000

96,000

106,000

116,000

129,000

50,001-60,000

$225

$250

$275

$300

$325

$350

The permit issued pursuant to this subsection (2) shall be specific to the motor vehicle to which it is issued. No permit or fee shall be transferable or apportionable to any other vehicle, nor shall any such fee be refundable. At the time of purchasing a permit, the applicant may purchase additional permits in any combination which does not exceed a maximum of ninety (90) days.

§ 49-433. Single trip permits

Fee. [Repealed.]

§ 49-434. Operating fees.

There shall be paid on all commercial vehicles, noncommercial vehicles, and on all farm vehicles having a maximum gross weight not in excess of sixty thousand (60,000) pounds, an annual registration fee or a staggered registration fee for the purpose of reregistration and notice of expiration in accordance with the following schedule.

Trailer or semitrailer in a combination of vehicles ............................... $15.00

Rental utility trailer with a gross weight of two thousand
(2,000) pounds or less ............................... $8.00

Rental utility trailer with a gross weight over two thousand
(2,000) pounds ............................... $15.00

Registration of a trailer or semitrailer based in another jurisdiction may be issued when the registrant provides a valid jurisdiction title or ownership document and certification statement, and no title transfer will be required.

Periodic verification will be made to confirm ownership status. Failure of the owner to comply with the verification request to confirm ownership within thirty (30) days shall result in cancellation of the permanent plate registration.

In addition to the fees set forth in paragraphs (a) and (c) of this subsection, an owner or operator may purchase a temporary permit as provided in section 49-432(2), Idaho Code, for operation of a vehicle at a weight in excess of the current, valid, registered maximum gross vehicle weight. The permit so issued shall be specific to the motor vehicle to which it is issued. No permit or fee shall be transferable or apportionable to any other vehicle, nor shall any such fee be refundable.

Any commercial or farm vehicle registered for more than sixty thousand (60,000) pounds up to one hundred six thousand (106,000) pounds traveling fewer than two thousand five hundred (2,500) miles annually on roads and highways in the state, county, city and highway district systems in Idaho shall pay an annual registration fee of two hundred fifty-five dollars ($255). The provisions of section 49-437(2), Idaho Code, shall not apply to vehicles registered under this paragraph.

8,001-16,000 inc.

$ 48.00

$ 48.00

16,001-26,000 inc.

61.08

143.40

26,001-30,000 inc.

91.68

223.80

30,001-40,000 inc.

130.08

291.60

40,001-50,000 inc.

188.28

360.00

50,001-60,000 inc.

311.88

515.40

In addition to the registration fees provided for in this subsection, there shall be an additional registration fee imposed of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).
(2) There shall be paid on all commercial vehicles, irrespective of body type, and on all farm vehicles having a maximum gross weight in excess of sixty thousand (60,000) pounds, an annual registration fee in the amount prescribed by subsection (8) of this section, as applicable.

(3) In addition, the annual registration fee for trailers shall be:

(4) As an option to the trailer and semitrailer and rental utility trailer annual registrations issued pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the department may provide a nonexpiring plate and registration for trailers and semitrailers, and an optional, extended registration for rental utility trailers.

(a) For trailers and semitrailers, the nonexpiring registration fee shall be ninety-nine dollars ($99.00). The license plate shall remain on the trailer or semitrailer until the registration is canceled or revoked. No part of the fee is subject to refund. However, the registrant may transfer the nonexpiring plate and registration to another trailer or semitrailer titled to the registrant if the original registration date is prior to July 1, 2009. The registration document shall be the official record of the status of the nonexpiring registration, and no registration fee shall be required after the initial registration is paid. No validation sticker shall be issued for license plates assigned under this section. The owner may be issued an electronic copy of the registration card issued pursuant to this section.

(b) Idaho-based trailer manufacturers may purchase trailer and semitrailer registration from the department. The manufacturer may issue the annual registration to foreign-based purchasers utilizing a manufacturer’s certificate of origin or manufacturer’s statement of origin as proof of ownership. If the foreign-based purchaser subsequently obtains an Idaho nonexpiring registration as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection prior to annual registration expiration, the amount of the annual registration fee shall be applied to the nonexpiring registration fee provided that the customer acquires a title for such vehicle.

(c) For rental utility trailers, the registrant may prepay the annual registration for an additional one (1), two (2), three (3) or four (4) years, but in no event shall the optional registration period extend beyond five (5) years. The fee shall be as specified in subsection (3)(b) or (c) of this section. The owner shall be issued a registration card or may request such card to be sent electronically. The expiration date shall be reflected on such registration card. The license plate shall become void if the owner’s interest in the rental utility trailer changes during the five (5) year period. If the owner fails to enter the rental utility trailer on the annual renewal application during the five (5) year period, the registration record shall be purged. Any unrenewed plate shall be returned to the department if it is not entered on the renewal application.
(5) A fleet registration option is available to owners who have twenty-five (25) or more commercial or farm vehicles or any combination thereof. Such owners may register all of their company vehicles with the department in lieu of registering with a county assessor. To qualify, the fleet must be owned and operated under the unified control of one (1) person and the vehicles must be physically garaged and maintained in two (2) or more counties. Fleet registration shall not include fleets of rental vehicles. The department shall provide a registration application to the owner, and the owner shall provide all information that the department determines is necessary. The department shall devise a special license plate numbering system for fleet-registered vehicles as an alternative to county license plates. The fleet registration application and all subsequent registration renewals shall include the physical address where a vehicle is principally used, garaged and maintained. The fleet owner shall report the physical address to the department upon initial registration, on each renewal, and at any time a vehicle registered under this option is permanently transferred to another location.

(6) If the ownership of a vehicle changes during the registration period, the original owner may transfer the plate to another vehicle. The remaining fee shall be credited against the cost of the new registration. Refunds may be given for any unexpired portion of the vehicle registration fee if the plate is not transferred by the owner to another vehicle. Any request for refund shall include surrender of the license plate and registration document, if a physical document was issued. Owners of vehicles registered under the international registration plan may request a refund of the unexpired portion of the Idaho vehicle registration fee by presenting evidence from the base jurisdiction that the license plate and registration document, if a physical document was issued, have been surrendered. A license plate shall not be transferred to another owner when the ownership of a vehicle changes. The owner shall obtain a replacement plate, if required, and a printed or electronic registration document when a plate is lost, destroyed, or becomes illegible.

(7) An administrative fee of four dollars ($4.00) shall be paid and deposited to the state highway account on all registrations completed by the department under subsection (1) or (8)(a) of this section. Vehicles registered under subsection (8)(b) of this section shall pay the fee provided in section 49-435(2), Idaho Code.

(8) There shall be paid on all commercial and farm vehicles having a maximum gross weight in excess of sixty thousand (60,000) pounds, a registration fee based upon the maximum gross weight of a vehicle as declared by the owner and the total number of miles driven on roads and highways in the state, county, city and highway district systems in Idaho, and if registered under the international registration plan (IRP), in all other jurisdictions. The appropriate registration fee shall be determined as follows:

(a) If the owner registers vehicles under the international registration plan (IRP), the appropriate mileage column shall be determined by the total miles an owner operated a fleet of vehicles on roads and highways in the state, county, city and highway district systems in Idaho and in all other jurisdictions in the preceding year, as defined in section 49-117, Idaho Code, and by the maximum gross weight of each vehicle within a fleet.

(b) If the owner registers vehicles under the international registration plan and determines that the average international registration plan fleet miles, calculated by dividing the total IRP fleet miles in all jurisdictions by the number of registered vehicles, is less than fifty thousand one (50,001) miles, the owner may apply to the department for refund of a portion of the registration fees paid, consistent with the fee schedules set forth in this section. The department shall provide an application for the refund. An owner making application for refund under this section shall be subject to auditing as provided in section 49-439, Idaho Code.
(c) If the owner is not registering vehicles under the international registration plan, the appropriate mileage column shall be determined by the total miles the owner operated each of the vehicles to be registered on roads and highways in the state, county, city and highway district systems in Idaho in the preceding year and by the maximum gross weight of each vehicle.

60,001-62,000

$223

$ 511

$ 789

$1,068

$1,560

62,001-64,000

$251

$ 576

$ 890

$1,205

$1,760

64,001-66,000

$280

$ 642

$ 992

$1,342

$1,960

66,001-68,000

$309

$ 707

$1,093

$1,479

$2,160

68,001-70,000

$337

$ 773

$1,194

$1,615

$2,360

70,001-72,000

$366

$ 838

$1,295

$1,752

$2,560

72,001-74,000

$394

$ 904

$1,396

$1,889

$2,760

74,001-76,000

$423

$ 969

$1,498

$2,026

$2,960

76,001-78,000

$451

$1,035

$1,599

$2,163

$3,160

78,001-80,000

$480

$1,100

$1,700

$2,300

$3,360

80,001-82,000

$494

$1,133

$1,751

$2,368

$3,460

82,001-84,000

$509

$1,165

$1,801

$2,437

$3,560

84,001-86,000

$523

$1,198

$1,852

$2,505

$3,660

86,001-88,000

$537

$1,231

$1,902

$2,574

$3,760

88,001-90,000

$551

$1,264

$1,953

$2,642

$3,860

90,001-92,000

$566

$1,296

$2,004

$2,711

$3,960

92,001-94,000

$580

$1,329

$2,054

$2,779

$4,060

94,001-96,000

$594

$1,362

$2,105

$2,848

$4,160

96,001-98,000

$609

$1,395

$2,155

$2,916

$4,260

98,001-100,000

$623

$1,427

$2,206

$2,985

$4,360

100,001-102,000

$637

$1,460

$2,257

$3,053

$4,460

102,001-104,000

$651

$1,493

$2,307

$3,121

$4,560

104,001-106,000

$666

$1,526

$2,358

$3,190

$4,660

106,001-108,000

$680

$1,558

$2,408

$3,258

$4,760

108,001-110,000

$694

$1,591

$2,459

$3,327

$4,860

110,001-112,000

$709

$1,624

$2,510

$3,395

$4,960

112,001-114,000

$723

$1,657

$2,560

$3,464

$5,060

114,001-116,000

$737

$1,689

$2,611

$3,532

$5,160

116,001-118,000

$751

$1,722

$2,661

$3,601

$5,260

118,001-120,000

$766

$1,755

$2,712

$3,669

$5,360

120,001-122,000

$780

$1,788

$2,763

$3,738

$5,460

122,001-124,000

$794

$1,820

$2,813

$3,806

$5,560

124,001-126,000

$809

$1,853

$2,864

$3,874

$5,660

126,001-128,000

$823

$1,886

$2,914

$3,943

$5,760

128,001-129,000

$837

$1,918

$2,965

$4,011

$5,860

In addition to the registration fees provided for in this subsection, there shall be an additional registration fee imposed of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

(9)(a) During the first registration year that the fee schedule in subsection (8)(c) of this section is in use, an owner shall use the mileage data from the records used to report the mileage use fee in the immediately preceding year as the basis for determining the appropriate registration fee schedule.

(b) Any owner who registers a motor vehicle for the first time and who has no mileage history for the vehicle shall estimate the miles to determine the appropriate fee schedule in subsection (8)(c) of this section. When estimating the miles, the owner shall provide a statement on the application of the method used to arrive at the estimated miles.

(c) Any owner using any fee schedule other than the highest fee schedule under subsection (8)(c) of this section shall certify at the time of registration that the miles operated in the preceding year do not exceed the schedule applied for. Any owner using a fee schedule under subsection (8)(c) of this section that is less than the highest schedule shall maintain records to substantiate the use of the schedule as required by section 49-439, Idaho Code.

(10) An owner registering under subsection (8)(a) or (8)(c) of this section may elect to pay the full annual registration fee at the time of registration or renewal of registration, or an owner may pay at least one-quarter (¼) of the annual registration fee due. The remainder of the annual Idaho registration fee shall be paid in three (3) equal installments on dates as billed by the department.

(11) An owner registering or renewing a registration under subsection (8)(a) of this section electing to use installment payments as provided in subsection (10) of this section shall pay all of the fees due to other IRP jurisdictions in addition to one-quarter (¼) of the Idaho fee due at the time of registration or reregistration. The remainder of the annual Idaho registration fee shall be paid in three (3) equal installments on dates as billed by the department.
(12) If any vehicle or combinations of vehicles haul nonreducible loads, as authorized under the provisions of section 49-1004, Idaho Code, and weigh less than the starting weights per axle configuration listed in column 1 of section 49-1004(2), Idaho Code, then and in that event there shall be paid for that vehicle, in addition to the other fees required in this section, an additional use fee of 2.1 mills per mile for each two thousand (2,000) pounds or fraction thereof of the maximum gross weight in excess of those set forth in section 49-1001, Idaho Code.

§ 49-434A. Penalties for failure to pay operating fees.

Any motor vehicle or combination of vehicles operated in Idaho for which the proper registration and operating fees in Idaho have not been paid under the provisions of section 49-432, 49-434 or 49-435, Idaho Code, shall have committed a misdemeanor punishable as provided in section 49-1013, Idaho Code, and shall, upon discovery, be subject to the following additional penalties:

Seizure and detention for up to seventy-two (72) hours by any law enforcement agency or port of entry personnel of the vehicle and its entire cargo if the cargo does not consist of perishable food products or livestock;

Release from detention shall be accomplished only by presentation of proper evidence that the applicable fees have been paid; or

Off-loading of any cargo onto a properly licensed and registered vehicle.